Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2668.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1302(a) of Title 8 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 1302. Tax levy.(a) Authority.--The council of the borough shall have power, by resolution for taxes levied at the same rate as or a rate lower than the previous fiscal year, and by ordinance if the tax rate increases from the previous fiscal year, to levy and collect annually a tax not exceeding 30 mills for general borough purposes, unless the council by majority action, upon due cause shown by resolution, petitions the court of common pleas, in which case the court may order a rate of not more than five mills additional to be levied and in addition any of the following taxes:12345678910111213141516171819 * * *(11) For the purpose of supporting a local police department, not to exceed three mills, only following a favorable referendum on the matter held in accordance with the election laws of this Commonwealth.* * *Section 2. Section 12531(a) of Title 11 is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 12531. Tax levies.(a) Property tax.--Council may, by resolution for taxes levied at the same rate as or a rate lower than the previous fiscal year, and by ordinance if the tax rate increases from the previous fiscal year, levy and, in accordance with this part, provide for the collection of taxes on all property within the city that is made taxable for city purposes and subject to valuation and assessment by the county assessment office or the city, as provided in Subchapter A (relating to assessments of property for taxation), as follows:* * *(6) An annual tax, not to exceed three mills, for the support of the city police department, only following a favorable referendum on the matter held in accordance with the election laws of this Commonwealth.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2668PN3703 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425